Mississippi, session 2026, SB2551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-9-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-9-39.  (1)  Each year from October 1 through March 1 and in accordance with the latest recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, each hospital shall offer, prior to discharge, immunizations against influenza virus to all inpatients sixty-five (65) years of age and older, and to all inpatients fifty (50) years of age and older that are at an increased risk of influenza complications, unless contraindicated and contingent upon the availability of the vaccine. (2)  Any hospital, or employee thereof, shall be immune from civil liability for any personal injury as a result of complying or not complying with the requirements of subsection (1) if the hospital or employee's action or failure to act do not amount to willful or wanton misconduct or gross negligence. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.